Missouri, session 2026, SB1365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 315.005, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
315.005 and 315.081, to read as follows:
315.005. As used in sections 315.005 to [315.065]
315.081, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Code", the standards relating to fire safety,
sanitation, electrical wiring, fuel-burning appliances,
plumbing, swimming pools and spas, sewage and waste
treatment and disposal as adopted by the department. The
department in its discretion, may incorporate, in whole or
in part, the standards or codes promulgated by the National
Fire Protection Association, Building Officials and Code
Administration International, Inc., Great Lakes Upper
Mississippi River Board of State Sanitary Engineers, and
American Society of Sanitary Engineers;
(2) "Department", the director of the department of
health and senior services or an agent of the director of
the department of health and senior services;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1365 2
(3) "Guest room", any room or unit where sleeping
accommodations are regularly furnished to the public;
(4) "Hosting platform", an electronic platform used by
a rental operator to advertise or facilitate the rental of a
short-term rental;
(5) "Human trafficking", the use of force, fraud, or
coercion to obtain some type of labor or commercial sex act
as defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102 and the commission of
an offense created by sections 566.200 to 566.223;
(6) "Human trafficking awareness training", training
established or approved by the department that includes, but
is not limited to, the following components:
(a) The definition of human trafficking and commercial
exploitation of children;
(b) Guidance on how to identify individuals at risk
for trafficking;
(c) Guidance on how to identify the signs of
trafficking and individuals potentially engaged in the act
of trafficking;
(d) Differences between labor and sex trafficking,
specific to the hotel sector;
(e) Guidance on the role of hospitality employees in
reporting and responding to human trafficking; and
(f) The contact information for the national human
trafficking hotline toll-free number and text line or
contact information for the local law enforcement agency;
(7) "Lodging establishment", any building, group of
buildings, structure, facility, place, or places of business
where five or more guest rooms are provided, which is owned,
maintained, or operated by any person and which is kept,
used, maintained, advertised or held out to the public for
hire which can be construed to be a hotel, motel, motor

SB 1365 3
hotel, apartment hotel, tourist court, resort, cabins,
tourist home, bunkhouse, dormitory, or other similar place
by whatever name called, and includes all such
accommodations operated for hire as lodging establishments
for either transient guests, permanent guests, or for both
transient and permanent guests;
[(5)] (8) "Owner", the person responsible for
obtaining a license from the department for operating the
lodging establishment;
[(6)] (9) "Permanent guest", any person who rents and
occupies a guest room in a lodging establishment for a
period of thirty-one days or more;
[(7)] (10) "Person", any individual, partnership,
corporation, association, organization, firm, or federal,
state, county, city, village, or municipal association or
corporation;
(11) "Short-term rental property", residential or
multifamily property used or offered for rent for transient
guest use through a hosting platform;
[(8)] (12) "Transient guest", any person who rents and
occupies a guest room in a lodging establishment for a
period of less than thirty-one days.
315.081. 1. Every employee of a lodging establishment
and every operator of a short-term rental property in this
state shall be required to receive human trafficking
awareness training within one hundred eighty days of
employment or the first listing of a short-term rental
property on a hosting platform, and after the first year of
employment or listing, annual human trafficking awareness
training not later than December thirty-first.
2. Every operator of a lodging establishment or short-
term rental property in this state shall implement

SB 1365 4
procedures and adopt policies for the reporting of suspected
human trafficking to the National Human Trafficking Hotline
or to a local law enforcement agency.
3. Any person who operates a lodging establishment or
short-term rental property shall maintain records of
employee or operator training. Such records shall be kept
on file by the operator of the lodging establishment or
short-term rental property for the period during which the
employee is employed by the establishment or the operator
manages the short-term rental property listing, and for one
year after such employment or operation ends. A lodging
establishment or short-term rental property operator shall
provide records to the department within a reasonable amount
of time, but no later than ten business days, after such
request is made in writing.
✓